Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.13.280

Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or offer.

(1) A dissenter may deliver a notice to the corporation informing the corporation of the dissenter's own estimate of the fair value of the dissenter's shares and amount of interest due, and demand payment of the dissenter's estimate, less any payment under RCW 23B.13.250, or reject the corporation's offer under RCW 23B.13.270 and demand payment of the dissenter's estimate of the fair value of the dissenter's shares and interest due, if:

(a) The dissenter believes that the amount paid under RCW 23B.13.250 or offered under RCW 23B.13.270 is less than the fair value of the dissenter's shares or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated;

(b) The corporation fails to make payment under RCW 23B.13.250 within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment; or

(c) The corporation does not effect the proposed corporate action and does not return the deposited certificates or release the transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment.

(2) A dissenter waives the right to demand payment under this section unless the dissenter notifies the corporation of the dissenter's demand under subsection (1) of this section within thirty days after the corporation made or offered payment for the dissenter's shares.

[ 2009 c 189 s 48; 2002 c 297 s 40; 1989 c 165 s 151.]